Wyoming, session 2026, HB0057.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-16-1313 is created to read:

21-16-1313. Hathaway private post secondary
institution scholarship; specifying eligible institutions;
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247
certification and payment of institutions; reporting
requirements; sunset.

(a) There is created the Hathaway private post
secondary institution scholarship. Subject to the
requirements of this section, the scholarship shall be
awarded to eligible students to attend private post
secondary institutions. For purposes of this section,
"private post secondary institution" means a state
accredited private post secondary degree granting
educational institution authorized to operate and provide
instruction in Wyoming in accordance with W.S. 21-2-401
through 21-2-407, including private post secondary degree
granting institutions exempt from licensure pursuant to
W.S. 21-2-406(a)(i)(C). The term includes institutions
offering programs that result in a certificate, as defined
by W.S. 21-16-1302(a)(iv), or a degree, as defined by W.S.
21-16-1302(a)(vi).

(b) Awards of the private post secondary institution
scholarships to students shall be contingent on available
funds and anticipated revenue to the Hathaway scholarship
expenditure account created by W.S. 21-13-1302(a).
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247

(c) The Hathaway private post secondary institution
scholarship shall be used only for a student's cost of
attendance at a private post secondary institution to
obtain a certificate or degree.

(d) Except as specified in this subsection, initial
eligibility for the Hathaway private post secondary
institution scholarship shall be as specified by W.S.
21-16-1303(b), (c) and (e). The department shall promulgate
rules to establish eligibility criteria for students that
complete a home-based educational program and students that
receive a high school equivalency certificate that comply
with the requirements contained in W.S. 21-13-1308(b)(iii)
and (iv). Except for students that complete a home-based
educational program or that receive a high school
equivalency certificate, recipients shall:

(i) Meet the success curriculum requirements
contained in W.S. 21-16-1307(b);

(ii) Have a minimum cumulative high school grade
point average (GPA) of 3.5;
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247

(iii) A score equal to or greater than the
2015-2016 national percentile rank of seventy-nine (79) on
an examination administered throughout the United States
and relied upon by institutions of higher education to
determine acceptance of students for attendance.

(e) No student shall be eligible for a Hathaway
private post secondary institution scholarship for more
than the equivalent of five hundred dollars ($500.00) per
semester at a private post secondary institution.
Scholarships under this section shall be available for
attendance at a private post secondary institution for not
more than eight (8) full-time semesters. Not more than two
hundred (200) students shall receive a Hathaway private
post secondary institution scholarship. Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, minimum continuing eligibility,
satisfactory academic progress and reinstatement
eligibility requirements for a Hathaway private post
secondary institution scholarship shall be as prescribed by
department rule.

HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247
(f) Except as provided in subsections (d) and (g) of
this section, the Hathaway private post secondary
institution scholarships shall not be subject to the
provisions of W.S. 21-16-1308, but shall be administered by
the department in accordance with this section and the
following:

(i) The department shall, in consultation with
private post secondary institution's admissions officers
and financial aid officers, promulgate rules necessary to
implement this section;

(ii) Students shall apply for Hathaway private
post secondary institution scholarships with the department
at the time of applying for admission at a private post
secondary institution or at an earlier time as established
by rule of the department. The application shall contain
information required by rule of the department. The
application shall require each applicant to verify under
penalty of false swearing under W.S. 6-5-303, that the
applicant has not been convicted of a felony in this state
or another jurisdiction;

HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247
(iii) Upon request of a student applying to a
private post secondary institution and applying for a
Hathaway private post secondary institution scholarship,
each school district shall provide the department an
official transcript of the student's academic record
through the student's most recent semester of attendance.
Following graduation and upon the student's request the
school district shall also provide the department an
official transcript of the student's complete academic
record. All transcripts provided pursuant to this paragraph
shall designate each course that satisfies the success
curriculum requirements established under W.S.
21-16-1307(b);

(iv) The department shall preliminarily
determine the student's eligibility for the Hathaway
private post secondary institution scholarship. For
students applying for a scholarship, unless the student's
complete academic record is available, the GPA used to
preliminarily determine eligibility shall be based upon the
student's official high school transcript after either the
end of the first semester of a student's senior year or the
second semester of a student's junior year, at the sole
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247
discretion of the eligible institution. For students
graduating prior to their senior year, the GPA used to
preliminarily determine eligibility shall be based upon the
student's official high school transcript as of the end of
the semester immediately prior to the last semester before
the student's graduation. High school GPAs for final
eligibility determinations for students applying for a
scholarship under this section shall be based upon the
student's complete high school academic record;

(v) The department shall determine and certify
to the state treasurer the amount of scholarships awarded
under this section for attendance at each eligible private
post secondary institution in the same manner and form
required by W.S. 21-16-1308(a)(v). The state treasurer
shall pay from the scholarship expenditure account the
amount certified by the department to each private post
secondary institution.

(g) The same information required to be reported
under W.S. 21-16-1308(c) shall be reported to the
department by each private post secondary institution
receiving funds pursuant to this section for the Hathaway
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247
private post secondary institution scholarship. The annual
report by the department shall be submitted to the governor
and the legislature in accordance with W.S. 9-2-1014.

(h) The department may conduct an audit of any
private post secondary institution receiving funds from the
scholarship program under this section to determine
compliance with any provision of this article and rules.

(j) This section is repealed July 1, 2029.

Section 2. W.S. 21-16-1301(a)(ix) and (xv),
21-16-1302(a), 21-16-1309(b)(i), (ii) and (iv) and
21-16-1311 are amended to read:

21-16-1301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(ix) "Eligible institution" means the University
of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college. For the purpose
of awarding private post secondary institution scholarships
under W.S. 21-16-1313 only, the term shall include private
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247
post secondary institutions, as defined by W.S.
21-16-1313(a);

(xv) "Scholarship" means an award provided
pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1304, 21-16-1305, or 21-16-1306 or
21-16-1313;

21-16-1302. Hathaway scholarship expenditure account
created; reserve account created; use and appropriation of
funds.

(a) The Hathaway scholarship expenditure account is
created to consist of earnings from the Hathaway student
scholarship endowment fund created by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vii)
and such other funds appropriated by the legislature to the
expenditure account. Eighty percent (80%) of all monies
deposited to the expenditure account under this section
shall be available for scholarships under W.S. 21-16-1304,
and 21-16-1305 and 21-16-1313. Twenty percent (20%) of all
monies deposited to the expenditure account under this
section shall be available for scholarships under W.S.
21-16-1306. Monies within the expenditure account are
continuously appropriated to the state treasurer for
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247
distribution to eligible institutions based on scholarships
awarded under this article. Except as otherwise provided in
this subsection, all unexpended and unencumbered monies
within the expenditure account at the end of each fiscal
year shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the
Hathaway student scholarship reserve account. For calendar
year 2023 and each calendar year, thereafter, all
unexpended and unencumbered monies within the expenditure
account on October 15 shall be deposited by the state
treasurer to the Hathaway student scholarship reserve
account on October 15.

21-16-1309. Scholarship amounts.

(b) To the extent sufficient funds are not available
in the expenditure account to fund all scholarships as
provided under this article:

(i) Funds available for scholarships under W.S.
21-16-1304, and 21-16-1305 and 21-16-1313 shall be used for
scholarships under W.S. 21-16-1306 after all scholarships
under W.S. 21-16-1304, and 21-16-1305 and 21-16-1313 have
been paid;
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247

(ii) Funds available for scholarships under W.S.
21-16-1306 shall be used for scholarships under W.S.
21-16-1304, and 21-16-1305 and 21-16-1313 after all
scholarships under W.S. 21-16-1306 have been paid;

(iv) If no funds remain available in the
expenditure account or reserve account at the time payment
is required to be made to an institution for any semester,
the payment to the eligible institutions and private post
secondary institutions shall be reduced on a first come
first served basis using the student's application date for
the scholarship.

21-16-1311. Hathaway scholarship program reporting.

The University of Wyoming, and each community college and
each private post secondary institution receiving funds
under this act shall report on the use of all scholarship
funds controlled by the institution, exclusive of federal
funds. The report shall show the total scholarship funds,
including scholarship funds granted via tuition discounts,
for the most recently completed biennium contrasted with
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247
the biennium ending June 30, 2006. The report shall show
how any funds supplanted by Hathaway scholarships have been
reallocated for other scholarship and student financial aid
programs or have been rebudgeted for other purposes and the
plans for such funds for the coming biennium. The report
shall describe the extent to which the university, and
community colleges and private post secondary institutions
receiving funds under this act have included within regular
written or electronic communications transmitted to alumni
of the institutions, information on the progress of the
scholarship programs established under this article and
information on making contributions to the Hathaway student
scholarship endowment account. The Wyoming community
college commission shall specify the format of, and combine
and transmit the reports on behalf of each college. The
University of Wyoming and the community college commission
shall include the reports within the respective biennial
budget requests submitted under W.S. 9-2-1013.

Section 3.

(a) Students graduating school year 2025-2026 through
school year 2028-2029 shall be eligible for Hathaway
HB0057

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0247
private post secondary institution scholarship, as created
by section 1 of this act.

(b) Any student awarded the Hathaway private post
secondary institution scholarship, as created by section 1
of this act, in school year 2025-2026 through school year
2028-2029 shall receive funds in accordance with W.S.
21-16-1313, contingent upon the student's continued
eligibility in accordance with W.S. 21-16-1313(e).

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0057